California, session 20252026, AB2019.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 87412 is added to the Education Code, to read:87412. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1) “Deported or detained faculty member” means a faculty member who departed the United States on or after January 1, 2027, who was teaching in a California community college at the time of departure or detention, and their departure occurred for any of the following reasons:(A) Due to immigration enforcement actions by the United States Department of Homeland Security.(B) Voluntarily due to the threat of immigration enforcement by the United States Department of Homeland Security.(C) Due to being denied reentry to the United States after voluntarily departing with the intention of making a brief trip abroad.(2) “Remote teaching arrangement” means an arrangement that allows a deported or detained faculty member to perform, to the extent possible, their instruction and professional duties through distance education or other remote modalities offered by the community college district.(b) A community college district shall allow a deported or detained faculty member of the community college district who meets subdivision (c) to perform, to the extent possible, their contracted instruction and professional duties through a remote teaching arrangement.(c) A deported or detained faculty member shall provide an attestation verifying that their departure occurred for one of the reasons described in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) to the human resources department of the community college district.(d) This section shall apply in scenarios where the rule of law is suspended, and standard detention or deportation scenarios.(e) This section shall be implemented to the greatest extent consistent with federal law.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.